Florida, session 2026, SB660.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âSection 409.993, Florida Statutes, is amended, 29 to read: 30 409.993âLead agencies and subcontractor liability.â 31 (1)âFINDINGS.â 32 (a)âThe Legislature finds that the state has traditionally 33 provided foster care services to children who are the 34 responsibility of the state. As such, foster children have not 35 had the right to recover for injuries beyond the limitations 36 specified in s. 768.28. The Legislature has determined that 37 foster care and related services should be outsourced pursuant 38 to this section and that the provision of such services is of 39 paramount importance to the state. The purpose of such 40 outsourcing is to increase the level of safety, security, and 41 stability of children who are or become the responsibility of 42 the state. One of the components necessary to secure a safe and 43 stable environment for such children is the requirement that 44 private providers maintain liability insurance. As such, 45 insurance needs to be available and remain available to 46 nongovernmental foster care and related services providers 47 without the resources of such providers being significantly 48 reduced by the cost of maintaining such insurance. 49 (b)âThe Legislature further finds that, by requiring the 50 following minimum levels of insurance, children in outsourced 51 foster care and related services will gain increased protection 52 and rights of recovery in the event of injury than currently 53 provided in s. 768.28. 54 (2)âDEFINITION.âAs used in this section, the term âculpably 55 negligent mannerâ means reckless indifference or grossly 56 careless disregard of human life. 57 (3)(2)âLEAD AGENCY LIABILITY.â 58 (a)âOther than an entity to which s. 768.28 applies, an 59 eligible community-based care lead agency, or its employees or 60 officers, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e) (b), 61 shall, as a part of its contract, obtain a minimum of $1 million 62 per occurrence with a policy period aggregate limit of $3 63 million in general liability insurance coverage. The lead agency 64 shall must also require that staff who transport client children 65 and families in their personal automobiles in order to carry out 66 their job responsibilities obtain minimum bodily injury 67 liability insurance in the amount of $100,000 per person per any 68 one automobile accident, and, subject to such limits for each 69 person, $300,000 for all damages resulting from any one 70 automobile accident, on their personal automobiles. In lieu of 71 personal motor vehicle insurance, the lead agencyâs casualty, 72 liability, or motor vehicle insurance carrier may provide 73 nonowned automobile liability coverage. This insurance provides 74 liability insurance for an automobile that the lead agency uses 75 in connection with the lead agencyâs business but does not own, 76 lease, rent, or borrow. This coverage includes an automobile 77 owned by an employee of the lead agency or a member of the 78 employeeâs household but only while the automobile is used in 79 connection with the lead agencyâs business. The nonowned 80 automobile coverage for the lead agency applies as excess 81 coverage over any other collectible insurance. The personal 82 automobile policy for the employee of the lead agency must shall 83 be primary insurance, and the nonowned automobile coverage of 84 the lead agency acts as excess insurance to the primary 85 insurance. The lead agency shall provide a minimum limit of $1 86 million in nonowned automobile coverage. In a tort action 87 brought against such a lead agency or employee, net economic 88 damages are shall be limited to $2 million per liability claim 89 and $200,000 per automobile claim, including, but not limited 90 to, past and future medical expenses, wage loss, and loss of 91 earning capacity, offset by any collateral source payment paid 92 or payable. In any tort action brought against a lead agency, 93 noneconomic damages are shall be limited to $400,000 per claim. 94 A claims bill may be brought on behalf of a claimant pursuant to 95 s. 768.28 for any amount exceeding the limits specified in this 96 paragraph. Any offset of collateral source payments made as of 97 the date of the settlement or judgment must shall be in 98 accordance with s. 768.76. 99 (b)âA The lead agency is not liable in tort for the acts or 100 omissions of its subcontractors or the officers, agents, or 101 employees if, at the time of the act or omission giving rise to 102 the claim, the lead agency has done all of the following: 103 1.âEnsured that any criminal background checks required by 104 law have occurred in a timely manner for its officers and 105 employees of its subcontractors. 106 2.âBefore hiring its officers and employees, and at least 107 once every 5 years thereafter, confirmed that its officers and 108 employees are not listed in a state registry or database that 109 indicates that any of the officers or employees are ineligible 110 to supervise or provide treatment to children. 111 3.âReported any known allegation of misconduct by its 112 officers and employees, as required by law. 113 4.âRequired its officers and employees to complete all of 114 the following training: 115 a.âAt least once every 5 years, child sexual abuse 116 prevention training. 117 b.âChild abuse and neglect reporting training. 118 (c)âA lead agency may be held liable in tort for the acts 119 or omissions of its officers and employees if the claimant shows 120 all of the following: 121 1.âThe lead agency was not in substantial compliance with a 122 requirement provided in paragraph (b) at the time of the act or 123 omission giving rise to the claim. 124 2.âThe requirement was designed to prevent the specific 125 type of harm alleged to have occurred. 126 3.âThe lead agencyâs failure to be in substantial 127 compliance with the requirement was a contributing factor in 128 bringing about the harm. 129 (d)âA lead agency is not liable in tort for the acts or 130 omissions of its subcontractors or the officers, agents, or 131 employees of its subcontractors. 132 (e)(b)âThe liability of a lead agency described in this 133 section is shall be exclusive and in place of all other 134 liability of such lead agency. The same immunities from 135 liability enjoyed by such lead agencies shall extend to each 136 employee of the lead agency if he or she is acting in 137 furtherance of the lead agencyâs business, including the 138 transportation of clients served, as described in this 139 subsection, in privately owned vehicles. Such immunities are not 140 applicable to a lead agency or an employee of the lead agency 141 who acts in a culpably negligent manner or with willful and 142 wanton disregard or unprovoked physical aggression if such acts 143 result in injury or death or such acts proximately cause such 144 injury or death. Such immunities are not applicable to employees 145 of the same lead agency when each is operating in the 146 furtherance of the agencyâs business, but they are assigned 147 primarily to unrelated work within private or public employment. 148 The same immunities from liability immunity provisions enjoyed 149 by a lead agency also apply to any sole proprietor, partner, 150 corporate officer or director, supervisor, or other person who, 151 in the course and scope of his or her duties, acts in a 152 managerial or policymaking capacity if and the conduct that 153 caused the alleged injury arose within the course and scope of 154 those managerial or policymaking duties. As used in this 155 subsection and subsection (3), the term âculpably negligent 156 mannerâ means reckless indifference or grossly careless 157 disregard of human life. 158 (4)(3)âSUBCONTRACTOR LIABILITY.â 159 (a)âA subcontractor of an eligible community-based care 160 lead agency that is a direct provider of foster care and related 161 services to children and families, and its employees or 162 officers, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (e) (c), 163 must, as a part of its contract, obtain a minimum of $1 million 164 per occurrence with a policy period aggregate limit of $3 165 million in general liability insurance coverage. The 166 subcontractor of a lead agency shall must also require that 167 staff who transport client children and families in their 168 personal automobiles in order to carry out their job 169 responsibilities obtain minimum bodily injury liability 170 insurance in the amount of $100,000 per person in any one 171 automobile accident, and, subject to such limits for each 172 person, $300,000 for all damages resulting from any one 173 automobile accident, on their personal automobiles. In lieu of 174 personal motor vehicle insurance, the subcontractorâs casualty, 175 liability, or motor vehicle insurance carrier may provide 176 nonowned automobile liability coverage. This insurance provides 177 liability insurance for automobiles that the subcontractor uses 178 in connection with the subcontractorâs business but does not 179 own, lease, rent, or borrow. This coverage includes automobiles 180 owned by the employees of the subcontractor or a member of the 181 employeeâs household but only while the automobiles are used in 182 connection with the subcontractorâs business. The nonowned 183 automobile coverage for the subcontractor applies as excess 184 coverage over any other collectible insurance. The personal 185 automobile policy for the employee of the subcontractor must 186 shall be primary insurance, and the nonowned automobile coverage 187 of the subcontractor acts as excess insurance to the primary 188 insurance. The subcontractor shall provide a minimum limit of $1 189 million in nonowned automobile coverage. In a tort action 190 brought against such subcontractor or employee, net economic 191 damages are shall be limited to $2 million per liability claim 192 and $200,000 per automobile claim, including, but not limited 193 to, past and future medical expenses, wage loss, and loss of 194 earning capacity, offset by any collateral source payment paid 195 or payable. In a tort action brought against such subcontractor, 196 noneconomic damages are shall be limited to $400,000 per claim. 197 A claims bill may be brought on behalf of a claimant pursuant to 198 s. 768.28 for any amount exceeding the limits specified in this 199 paragraph. Any offset of collateral source payments made as of 200 the date of the settlement or judgment must shall be in 201 accordance with s. 768.76. 202 (b)âA subcontractor of a lead agency is not liable in tort 203 for the acts or omissions of the subcontractorâs officers, 204 agents, or employees if, at the time of the act or omission 205 giving rise to the claim, the subcontractor has done all of the 206 following: 207 1.âEnsured that any criminal background checks required by 208 law have occurred in a timely manner for its officers, agents, 209 or employees. 210 2.âBefore hiring, contracting with, or otherwise enlisting 211 the services of its officers, agents, or employees, and at least 212 once every 5 years thereafter, confirmed its officers, agents, 213 and employees are not listed in a state registry or database 214 that indicates that any of the officers, agents, or employees 215 are ineligible to supervise or provide treatment to children. 216 3.âReported any known allegation of misconduct by its 217 officers, agents, or employees, as required by law. 218 4.âRequired its officers, agents, and employees to complete 219 all of the following training: 220 a.âAt least once every 5 years, child sexual abuse 221 prevention training. 222 b.âChild abuse and neglect reporting training. 223 (c)âA subcontractor of a lead agency may be held liable in 224 tort for the acts or omissions its officers, agents, or 225 employees if the claimant shows all of the following: 226 1.âThe subcontractor was not in substantial compliance with 227 a requirement provided in paragraph (b) at the time of the act 228 or omission giving rise to the claim. 229 2.âThe requirement was designed to prevent the specific 230 type of harm alleged to have occurred. 231 3.âThe subcontractorâs failure to be in substantial 232 compliance with the requirement was a contributing factor in 233 bringing about the harm. 234 (d)(b)âA subcontractor of a lead agency that is a direct 235 provider of foster care and related services is not liable for 236 the acts or omissions of the lead agency; the department; or the 237 officers, agents, or employees thereof. The limitation on 238 liability established in this paragraph applies to contracts 239 entered into or renewed after July 1, 2025. 240 (e)(c)âThe liability of a subcontractor of a lead agency 241 that is a direct provider of foster care and related services as 242 described in this section is exclusive and in place of all other 243 liability of such provider. The same immunities from liability 244 enjoyed by such subcontractor provider extend to each employee 245 of the subcontractor when such employee is acting in furtherance 246 of the subcontractorâs business, including the transportation of 247 clients served, as described in this subsection, in privately 248 owned vehicles. Such immunities are not applicable to a 249 subcontractor or an employee who acts in a culpably negligent 250 manner or with willful and wanton disregard or unprovoked 251 physical aggression if such acts result in injury or death or if 252 such acts proximately cause such injury or death. Such 253 immunities are not applicable to employees of the same 254 subcontractor who are operating in the furtherance of the 255 subcontractorâs business but are assigned primarily to unrelated 256 works within private or public employment. The same immunity 257 provisions enjoyed by a subcontractor also apply to any sole 258 proprietor, partner, corporate officer or director, supervisor, 259 or other person who, in the course and scope of his or her 260 duties, acts in a managerial or policymaking capacity and the 261 conduct that caused the alleged injury arose within the course 262 and scope of those managerial or policymaking duties. 263 (4)âLIMITATIONS ON DAMAGES.âThe Legislature is cognizant of 264 the increasing costs of goods and services each year and 265 recognizes that fixing a set amount of compensation has the 266 effect of a reduction in compensation each year. Accordingly, 267 the conditional limitations on damages in this section shall be 268 increased at the rate of 5 percent each year, prorated from July 269 1, 2014, to the date at which damages subject to such 270 limitations are awarded by final judgment or settlement. 271 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.